Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-157.02
Recruiting; strength maintenance; expenditure of funds; Adjutant General; supervise.

Recruiting and strength maintenance activities of the Military Department may include, but shall not be limited to, (1) provision to members of the National Guard of suitable awards, honorariums, or other proper recognition for successful recruiting efforts, (2) provision for the financial support of official National Guard functions, the purpose of which is to provide information in regard to and create interest in the National Guard among potential recruits and their families, (3) the preparation and dissemination of informational material in regard to the National Guard, and (4) advertising in public media for recruiting purposes, and all necessary expenses in connection therewith. The Adjutant General shall supervise the expenditure of such funds for the purposes enumerated.

Laws 1974, LB 983, § 8.